Wisconsin, session 2025, SB478.
do enact as follows:SB478,11Section 1. 452.133 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB478,3,22452.133 (3) (a) Accept any fee or compensation related to the transaction from 3any person other than the licensee’s client, principal firm, or firm, without the prior 4written consent of all parties to the transaction. This paragraph does not prohibit 1an out-of-state broker from accepting a fee or compensation in the case of a 2cooperative agreement under s. 452.137 (2) (am).SB478,23Section 2. 452.133 (3) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB478,3,94452.133 (3) (c) Except as provided in s. 452.19 (1) (1m) (a), refer, recommend, 5or suggest to a party to the transaction the services of an individual or entity from 6which the licensee may receive compensation for a referral or in which the licensee 7has an interest, unless the licensee has disclosed in writing the fact that the 8licensee may receive compensation or has disclosed in writing an interest in the 9individual or entity providing the services.SB478,310Section 3. 452.1355 of the statutes is created to read:SB478,3,1411452.1355 Transactions involving residential property. (1) A listing 12firm representing an owner in a transaction involving the owner’s residential 13property containing one to four dwelling units shall, except as provided in sub. (4), 14do all of the following:SB478,3,1615(a) Share information on the property with any licensees representing 16prospective buyers or tenants.SB478,3,1817(b) Respond to inquiries from any licensees representing prospective buyers or 18tenants.SB478,3,1919(c) Make the property available for showing to prospective buyers or tenants.SB478,4,220(d) Within one business day from the start date of any agency agreement 21authorizing the listing firm to sell or lease the owner’s property, advertise or 22market the owner’s property for sale or lease on one or more Internet platforms or 23websites accessible to the general public and any real estate licensees representing 1prospective buyers or tenants, unless the owner completes and signs a disclosure 2and opt-out form prescribed by the department that includes all of the following:SB478,4,531. The owner’s written request that the listing firm withhold the owner’s 4property from public marketing or advertising identified by the owner, along with a 5statement of the reason for the request.SB478,4,762. The owner’s written acknowledgment, initialed by the owner, that all of the 7following apply:SB478,4,98a. Real estate licensees and prospective buyers or tenants may not be aware 9that the owner’s property is available for sale or lease.SB478,4,1110b. The owner’s property will not appear on Internet platforms or websites that 11are used by the general public to search for property listings.SB478,4,1312c. Licensees and prospective buyers or tenants may not be aware of the terms 13and conditions under which the owner is offering the property for sale or lease.SB478,4,1714d. The reduced exposure of the property may reduce the number of offers to 15purchase or lease the property, may result in reduced sales or lease price for the 16property, and may negatively affect the owner’s ability to sell or lease the property 17at terms favorable to the owner.SB478,4,2118(2) A licensee who, in good faith, acts to fulfill the duties under sub. (1) may 19not be held civilly liable for any disclosure or representation made in fulfilling those 20duties, unless the licensee knowingly makes a false, deceptive, or misleading 21representation.SB478,4,2422(3) The owner of a residential property containing one to four dwelling units 23may authorize the use of electronic signatures for all documents related to any 24agency agreement or any disclosure for which a signature is required.SB478,5,41(4) The owner of a residential property containing one to four dwelling units 2may identify by name any licensee, prospective buyer, or prospective tenant that the 3owner does not wish to work with or allow to view the property, provided that such 4restrictions comply with all applicable state and federal laws.SB478,5,65(5) The board shall develop and make publicly available a consumer brochure 6that includes all of the following:SB478,5,87(a) An explanation of the benefits of publicly marketing property to increase 8exposure and attract interest from prospective buyers or tenants.SB478,5,109(b) Information on the potential impacts of limiting the marketing of a 10property.SB478,5,1211(c) An explanation of the purpose and implications of signing the disclosure 12and opt-out form under sub. (1) (d).SB478,5,1413(d) Guidance on how marketing restrictions may affect exposure, competition, 14and final sale price.SB478,5,1615(e) Sample questions for consumers to ask listing firms regarding their 16marketing strategies.SB478,417Section 4. 452.136 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB478,5,2118452.136 (1m) Advertising enhanced by technology. A licensee shall in all 19advertising disclose if the advertising has been altered or modified using 20technology, including artificial intelligence, to add, remove, or change elements of 21the property that creates a false or misleading impression of the property.SB478,522Section 5. 452.19 (title) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB478,5,2323452.19 (title) Fees, commissions, and other compensation.SB478,624Section 6. 452.19 of the statutes is renumbered 452.19 (1m).SB478,71Section 7. 452.19 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB478,6,52452.19 (3) (a) 1. A firm shall not accept compensation of any kind from 3another firm in connection with brokerage services performed as part of a real 4estate transaction involving a residential property containing one to four dwelling 5units.SB478,6,862. The prohibition under subd. 1. applies regardless of whether the firm 7represents different parties, such as buyer and seller, or whether a non-listing firm 8is acting as a buyer’s agent, as a subagent, or in another cooperative capacity.SB478,6,1093. Subdivision 1. does not prohibit the payment of compensation for a referral 10fee or a finder’s fee as described in sub. (1m).SB478,6,1211(b) Any agreement or arrangement that violates this subsection is void and 12unenforceable.SB478,813Section 8. 452.19 (4) of the statutes is created to read:SB478,6,1714452.19 (4) (a) In any transaction involving a residential property containing 15one to four dwelling units, if a seller agrees to pay compensation to a firm that is not 16the listing firm for brokerage services provided to a buyer, the agreement must 17satisfy all of the following:SB478,6,19181. Be expressly stated in the fully executed offer to purchase or option to 19purchase.SB478,6,20202. Be signed by the buyer and the seller as part of the contract.SB478,6,2421(b) A firm that is not the listing firm may not receive compensation from a 22party to a transaction who is not the client of the firm unless the agreement to pay 23the compensation is documented in the executed offer to purchase or option to 24purchase. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb478 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb478 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB478 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB478 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB478: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting